Illinois, session 104th, SB2037.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Digital Age Assurance Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purposes.7        (1) Creating a barrier between minors and mature 8    content and mature online experiences requires a solution 9    that protects minors while also protecting privacy and 10    safeguarding personal information.11        (2) Current efforts to make online environments safer 12    for children are ineffective.13        (3) 95% of teens in the United States have access to 14    smartphones.15        (4) Teens in the United States with access to digital 16    devices use an average of 40 different applications on 17    those devices.18        (5) 97% of teens in the United States are daily 19    Internet users, and 46% of teens in the United States 20    respond that they are online almost constantly.21        (6) Individual application-based or website-based age 22    assurance will not protect minors across this broad online 23    ecosystem.  SB2037- 2 -LRB104 03437 SPS 13460 b1        (7) The most effective and privacy-protective way of 2    achieving age assurance is at the point of access, on 3    devices themselves.4        (8) Parents and guardians want more control over their 5    minor children's device use and online experiences. The 6    best way to empower parents and guardians is to create an 7    industry-wide solution through which all online services 8    are held to the same consistent standard. 9    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:10    "Application store" means a publicly available website, 11software application, or online service that distributes 12third-party platforms' software applications to a computer, a 13mobile device, or any other general-purpose computing device.14    "Covered manufacturer" means a manufacturer of a device, 15an operating system for a device, or an application store.16    "Device" means a device or a portion of a device that is 17designed for and capable of communicating across a computer 18network with other computers or devices for the purpose of 19transmitting, receiving, or storing data, including, but not 20limited to, a desktop, laptop, cellular telephone, tablet, or 21other device designed for and capable of communicating with or 22across a computer network and that is used for that purpose.23    "Mature content" has the same meaning given to the term 24"sexually explicit conduct" as defined in 18 U.S.C. 252256(2)(A).  SB2037- 3 -LRB104 03437 SPS 13460 b1    "Minor" means an individual under the age of 18.2    "Operating system provider" means an entity that develops, 3distributes, or maintains, a device's operating system, and 4provides common services. "Operating system provider" 5includes, but is not limited to, the design, programming, and 6supply of operating systems for various devices, such as 7smartphones, tablets, and other digital equipment.8    "Substantial portion" means more than one-third of the 9total material on a website, application, or online service. 10    Section 15. Age assurance required.11    (a) A covered manufacturer shall take commercially 12reasonable and technically feasible steps to:13        (1) upon the device's activation determine or estimate 14    the age of the device's primary user;15        (2) provide websites, applications, application 16    stores, and online services with a digital signal 17    regarding whether an individual is under the age of 13, at 18    least 13 years of age and under 16 years of age, at least 19    16 years of age and under 18 years of age, or at least 18 20    years of age through a real-time application programming 21    interface; and22        (3) in the case of a covered manufacturer that is an 23    application store, obtain parental or guardian consent 24    before permitting an individual under 16 years of age to 25    download an application from the application store and   SB2037- 4 -LRB104 03437 SPS 13460 b1    provide the parent or guardian with the option to connect 2    the developer of the application with the approving parent 3    or guardian for the purpose of facilitating parental 4    supervision tools.5    (b) For devices sold before the effective date of this 6Act, covered manufacturers shall ensure that the requirements 7under subsection (a) are included in its operating system and 8application store versions and updates by default after the 9effective date of this Act.10    (c) Any website, application, or online service that makes 11available mature content shall:12        (1) recognize and allow for the receipt of digital age 13    signals as described in this Act;14        (2) if a substantial portion of the total material on 15    the website, application, or online service is mature 16    content, it shall:17            (A) block access to the website, application, or 18        online service when a digital age signal is received 19        indicating a user is under 18 years of age;20            (B) provide a disclaimer to users or visitors that 21        the website, application, or online service contains 22        mature content; and23            (C) label itself as restricted to adults; and24        (3) if less than a substantial portion of the total 25    material on the website, application, or online is mature 26    content:  SB2037- 5 -LRB104 03437 SPS 13460 b1            (A) block access to known mature content when a 2        digital age signal is received indicating a user is 3        under 18 years of age; and4            (B) provide a disclaimer to users or visitors 5        before displaying known mature content.6    (d) A website, application, or online service that, 7through receipt of a digital age signal or otherwise attains 8actual knowledge that a user is under 18 years of age shall, to 9the extent commercially reasonable and technically feasible, 10provide readily available features for parents or guardians to 11support a minor with respect to the minor's use of the website, 12application, or online service, including features to help 13manage which individuals or accounts are affirmatively linked 14to the minor, to help manage the delivery of age-appropriate 15content, and to limit the amount of time that the minor spends 16daily on the website, application, or online service.17    (e) A covered manufacturer shall comply with this Act in a 18nondiscriminatory manner by, among other things:19        (1) imposing at least the same restrictions and 20    obligations on its own websites, applications, and online 21    services as it does on those from third parties; and22        (2) not using data collected from third parties, or 23    consent mechanisms deployed for third parties, in the 24    course of compliance with this Act, to compete against 25    those third parties, to give the covered manufacturer's 26    services preference relative to those of third parties, or   SB2037- 6 -LRB104 03437 SPS 13460 b1    to otherwise use the data or consent mechanism in an 2    anti-competitive manner.3    (f) The Attorney General may adopt rules as may be 4necessary to establish the processes by which entities are to 5comply with the provisions of this Section. 6    Section 20. Enforcement. 7    (a) The Attorney General may commence a civil action to 8enforce the provisions of this Act.9    (b) Before initiating an action under this Act, the 10Attorney General shall provide an entity with written notice 11identifying the specific provisions of this Act the Attorney 12General alleges the entity has violated. If the entity cures 13those violations within 45 days of receipt of the written 14notice and provides the Attorney General with a written 15statement that the alleged violations have been cured, no 16further action shall be initiated against the entity.17    (c) If an entity continues to violate this Act after 18receiving the written notice from the Attorney General or 19fails to respond to the written statement as described in 20subsection (b), the Attorney General may initiate a civil 21action and seek damages for up to $10,000 per violation of this 22Act. The damages shall begin accruing 45 days after the 23receipt of the written notice from the Attorney General.24    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed as providing 25the basis for, or be subject to, a private right of action.  SB2037- 7 -LRB104 03437 SPS 13460 b1    (e) A covered manufacturer shall not be subject to 2liability for failure to comply with this Act if that covered 3manufacturer has taken commercially reasonable and technically 4feasible steps to determine or estimate the age of the 5device's user as required in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) 6of Section 15. 7    Section 25. Uniformity of interpretation. This Act shall 8be construed and interpreted to effectuate its general purpose 9and to make uniform the law in those states that enact similar 10statutes. 11    Section 30. Conflict of law. The provisions of this Act 12shall be construed to take precedence over any conflict of law 13in accordance with the Statute on Statutes 14    Section 35. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 15the activities described in Section 15 in a manner more 16restrictive than the regulation by the State of those 17activities under this Act. This Section is a limitation under 18subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 19Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule units of 20powers and functions exercised by the State 21    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 22severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.   SB2037- 8 -LRB104 03437 SPS 13460 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 21, 2026.